Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5311.01
Compliance not dependent on funding.

The failure or inability of any public water system to receive funds under the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Act or any other loan or grant program or any delay in obtaining the funds shall not alter the obligation of the system to comply in a timely manner with the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 22;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 43.

Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Act, see section 71-5314.